Maryland, session 2026, HB1142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force to Modernize County and Municipal Revenue
Structures.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Comptroller, or the Comptroller’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Budget and Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Director of Assessments and Taxation, or the Director’s designee;
(6) two representatives from the Maryland Municipal League, designated
by the Chief Executive Officer of the Maryland Municipal League;
(7) two representatives from the Maryland Association of Counties,
designated by the Executive Director of the Maryland Association of Counties; and
(8) one representative from Baltimore City, appointed by the Mayor.
(c) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Delegates jointly
shall designate the chair of the Task Force.
(d) The Department of Legislative Services shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
– 1 –

Ch. 17 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) may not receive compensation for serving as a member of the Task
Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) study and evaluate the revenue structure of the county and municipal
governments within the State, including:
(i) current revenue sources available to each county and municipal
government;
(ii) optional revenue sources not currently utilized by county and
municipal governments;
(iii) the authority of each county and municipal government to raise
revenue from additional sources;
(iv) the revenue sources utilized by counties and municipal
governments in other states; and
(v) an analysis of the impact of potential new county or municipal
revenue sources on the overall affordability of goods and services and the general cost of
living, including an accounting of existing taxes; and
(2) make recommendations regarding the authority of county and
municipal governments to increase sources of revenue.
(g) On or before December 1, 2026, the Task Force shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House
Appropriations Committee, and the House Ways and Means Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
with no further action required by the General Assembly, this Act shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –